California, session 20252026, AB2659.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The trucking and logistics industry is the backbone of California’s economy, moving essential goods, food, and medicine across the state and the nation.(b) During the COVID-19 pandemic, truck drivers were designated as essential workers and risked their health to maintain the supply chain.(c) A significant portion of California’s trucking workforce is comprised of immigrants who have followed legal processes to obtain work authorization and licensure.(d) Sudden revocations of commercial driver’s licenses due to bureaucratic changes, administrative errors, or shifts in federal or state policy interpretation regarding residency create economic chaos for working families and disrupt the supply chain.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that no qualified, safe driver loses their livelihood due to administrative technicalities without adequate time and support to cure the deficiency.SEC. 2. Section 15225 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:15225. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not revoke, suspend, cancel, or downgrade a commercial driver’s license based solely on administrative deficiencies or clerical errors created or made by the department, or due to changes in the department’s interpretation of domicile or residency requirements, unless the department provides the licensee with a written notice of intent to revoke, suspend, cancel, or downgrade their license at least 180 days prior to the effective date of the action.(b) The notice required by subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:(1) The specific reason for the proposed action.(2) A clear description of the documents or actions required to cure the deficiency.(3) Information regarding the licensee’s right to administrative review.(c) During the 180 day notice period described in subdivision (a), the department shall prioritize assisting the impacted licensee to resolve the administrative error or deficiency. The department shall establish a dedicated process to review documents submitted by these licensees to expedite compliance.(d) (1) If the licensee has taken steps to resolve the deficiency but is unable to complete the process within the 180 day period due to processing delays by the department or a federal agency, the department may grant a one-time extension of up to 90 days.(2) The department shall grant the extension if it determines that the licensee is making a good faith effort to comply and that the issue is likely to be fully resolved within the extension period.(e) This section does not apply to a revocation, suspension, cancellation, or downgrade resulting from any of the following:(1) A violation of traffic laws involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle.(2) A conviction for a crime that disqualifies a person from holding a commercial driver’s license under state or federal law.(3) A determination by the department that the licensee poses an immediate threat to public safety.(4) A finding that the licensee obtained the license through fraud or the submission of falsified documents.(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent authorized by federal law.